Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5199HV (2) 91 sb/js H.F. 2626 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 466D.1 Emergency systems ââ 1 campgrounds. 2 1. For purposes of this section: 3 a. âCampgroundâ means the same as defined in section 557B.l. 4 b. âDepartmentâ means the department of natural resources. 5 c. âFloodplainâ means the same as âfloodplainsâ as defined 6 in section 455B.261. 7 2. A campground operating in a floodplain in the state of 8 Iowa shall have all of the following: 9 a. An emergency alarm system installed and operating 10 within the campground that can function without an internet 11 connection. 12 b. Emergency evacuation directions posted in all occupied 13 structures. 14 3. The department shall have the power and authority 15 reasonably necessary to effectuate this section. 16